West Virginia, session 2026, HB4885.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 14C. MOTOR FUEL EXCISE TAX. §11-14C-5.  Taxes levied; rate. [Repealed.] NOTE: The purpose of this bill is to remove taxes on gasoline.Strike-throughs indicate language that would be stricken from a heading or the present law and underscoring indicates new language that would be added. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home